Mississippi, session 20251E, SB2006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning for the purpose of paying the expenses incurred in the operation and maintenance of the Forest and Wildlife Research Center, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026................................ $     6,262,007.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby authorized for expenditure out of any special source funds which are collected by or otherwise become available for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the Forest and Wildlife Research Center, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026................................ $ 1,369,899.00. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2 of this act, Four Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($450,000.00) shall be derived from the Education Enhancement Fund from funds deposited pursuant to Sections 27-65-75 and 27-67-31, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 4.  No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds which are being used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. SECTION 5.  It is the intention of the Legislature that if the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act are used directly or indirectly to match or otherwise secure any federal grants, research grants or donations, such special source funds not classified as restricted funds shall be added and accounted for under Section 2 of this act.  Further, it is the intention of the Legislature that all such aforementioned special source funds be included in all reports and requests for the 2026 Regular Session of the Mississippi Legislature. SECTION 6.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2027 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2026 budget request process. SECTION 7.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 8.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 9.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated for the Forest and Wildlife Research Center for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Fund, as appropriated in SB 3011, 2024 Regular Session, for the Deer Lab renovations for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026....................................................... ............................................ $ 1,000,000.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2025, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 10.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 11.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.